Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-303
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Telecommunications Relay System Act, the definitions found in sections 86-304 to 86-311 apply.

Laws 1990, LB 240, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 86-902;

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 25;

Laws 1995, LB 146, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 359, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1303;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 181.